Utah statutes.
70A-8-209.   Issuer's lien.

A lien in favor of an issuer upon a certificated security is valid against a purchaser only if the right of the issuer to the lien is noted conspicuously on the security certificate.



Enacted by Chapter 204, 1996 General Session

